Utah statutes.
53B-8e-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Purple Heart recipient" means any Utah resident who is a military veteran and who has earned a Purple Heart award as a result of military service.

(2)  "State institution of higher education" means an institution listed in Section 53B-1-102.

(3) (a)  "Tuition" means tuition at the rate for residents of the state.

(b)  "Tuition" excludes fees.



Enacted by Chapter 181, 2004 General Session

